Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1211
Pumps and pumping equipment, defined.

Pumps and pumping equipment shall mean any equipment or materials utilized or intended for use in withdrawing or obtaining ground water including, but not limited to, seals, tanks, fittings, and controls.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 11.